Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1129.01
Applicator's certificate; revocation; grounds.

An applicator's certificate may be revoked by the department if the applicator:

(1) Operates a chemigation system that is known to be defective or not in compliance with permit requirements;

(2) Fails to report any actual or suspected accident resulting from the use of chemigation;

(3) Operates or authorizes operation of a chemigation system without the necessary permit; or

(4) Violates any of the provisions of the Nebraska Chemigation Act or standards, rules, and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.

Laws 1988, LB 1046, § 5.